Washington statutes.
RCW 27.24.040

Annual report.

The board of law library trustees shall, on or before the first Monday in September of each year, make a report to the county legislative authority of their county giving the condition of their trust, with a full statement of all property received and how used, the number of books and other publications on hand, the number added by purchase, gift or otherwise during the preceding year, the number lost or missing, and such other information as may be of public interest, together with a financial report showing all receipts and disbursements of money.

[ 1992 c 62 s 3; 1919 c 84 s 4; RRS s 8250.]